Idaho statutes. Title 36 FISH AND GAME
Chapter 19
WILDLIFE PRESERVES

Sec.

§ 36-1901. Purpose of preserves.

The wildlife preserves herein described are created for the better protection of wild animals and birds, for the establishment of breeding places therefor and for the preservation of the species thereof.

§ 36-1902. Wild animals and wild birds protected.

No person shall take any wild animals or wild birds in any of the wildlife preserves within the state of Idaho which have been created by law except as hereinafter provided or by commission regulation promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section 36-104(b)4, Idaho Code.

§ 36-1903. Depredation control.

Conservation Officers to Authorize Taking of Predatory Animals. Predatory animals may be taken within a wildlife preserve by conservation officers or persons authorized by conservation officers when such animals are causing damage.

Control of Other Wildlife Causing Damage. Other wildlife causing damage to any private property within said preserve shall be controlled in accordance with the provisions of section 36-1107, Idaho Code.

§ 36-1904. Possession as prima facie evidence of violation

Exception. [Repealed.]

§ 36-1905. Myrtle Creek preserve.

There is hereby created within the boundaries of Boundary County, within the state of Idaho, a wildlife preserve to be known as Myrtle Creek preserve, the boundaries of which are as follows: beginning at the southwest corner of section 23, township 62 north, range 1 west of the Boise meridian; thence north along the west line of section 23 to the summit of the ridge between Myrtle Creek and Cascade Creek, thence northwesterly along this ridge to Burton Peak, then westerly along the summit of the ridge between Myrtle Creek and Ball Creek to Myrtle Peak, then southerly around the head of Myrtle Creek following the summit of the ridge between Myrtle Creek and Two Mouth Creek, to Harrison Peak, then following the summit of the ridge between Myrtle Creek and Snow Creek in an easterly direction to a point approximately 1 mile east of Kootenai Point where this ridge intersects the east line of section 28, township 62 north, range 1 west of the Boise meridian; thence in a northeasterly direction to the point of beginning.

Fishing restricted. In addition to the provisions of section 36-1902, Idaho Code, it shall be unlawful for any person at any time to fish within the boundaries of the aforesaid Myrtle Creek preserve. Provided that the Idaho fish and game commission may, after receiving concurrent written approval from the Idaho department of environmental quality and the Bonners Ferry city council, open certain waters and lands lying within the Myrtle Creek preserve to hunting, fishing or trapping during prescribed seasons. Provided further that any fish eradication treatment of waters in the Myrtle Creek preserve by the Idaho department of fish and game shall be undertaken only with the concurrent written permission of the Idaho department of environmental quality and the Bonners Ferry city council and under the direct supervision of the Idaho department of environmental quality.

§ 36-1906. David Thompson preserve.

There is hereby created within the boundaries of Bonner County in the state of Idaho a wildlife preserve to be known as the David Thompson wildlife preserve, the boundaries of which are described as follows: Commencing where the east and west ½ section line of section 1, township 56 north, range 1 east, Boise meridian, leaves Lake Pend Oreille at elevation 2,061 feet above sea level; thence east on said line until it crosses the east and west state highway; thence along said highway until said highway crosses the north and south ½ section line on Section 7, township 56 north, range 2 east, Boise meridian; thence south on said ½ section line through sections 7, 18 and 19 to where the line intersects the Clark Fork river; thence following the shoreline of said river to the shoreline of Lake Pend Oreille, thence at an elevation of 2,061 feet above sea level, along the shoreline of Lake Pend Oreille to the place of beginning.

§ 36-1907. Lewiston Orchards preserve. [Repealed.]

§ 36-1908. Lewiston preserve.

There is hereby created within the boundaries of Nez Perce County, within the state of Idaho, a preserve to be known as Lewiston preserve, the boundaries of which are described as follows: all that territory on both sides of the Clearwater River between Spalding and the Eighteenth Street Bridge across the Clearwater River, in the city of Lewiston, Idaho, and the north and south highway on the north side of the said Clearwater River, and Camas Prairie railroad on the south side of said Clearwater River.

§ 36-1909, 36-1910. Payette River, South Fork and Soldier Mountain Wildlife preserve. [Repealed.]

§ 36-1911. Springfield bird preserve [haven].

There is hereby created within the county of Bingham, in the state of Idaho and within the following described boundaries, a limited wildlife preserve to be known as the Springfield Bird Haven: beginning at the north ¼ corner of section 15 in township 4 south, range 32 east of the Boise meridian, and running thence north to the northwest corner of the southwest ¼ of the southeast ¼ of section 10 in the township and range aforesaid; thence east to the northeast corner of the southeast ¼ of the southeast ¼ of said section; thence south to the Roosevelt highway; thence east along the north line of said highway, a distance of 160 rods, more or less, to the east line of the southwest ¼ of section 11 in the township and range aforesaid; thence south to the center of section 14, in the township and range aforesaid; thence west to the southwest corner of the southeast ¼ of the northeast ¼ of section 15 aforesaid; thence northwesterly in a straight diagonal line to the point of beginning.

Game Birds and Waterfowl Protected. Other provisions of section 36-1902, Idaho Code, notwithstanding, this section shall apply only to protected wild birds.

§ 36-1912. Minidoka Forest state bird preserve. [Repealed.]

§ 36-1913. Pocatello Forest preserve. [Repealed.]

§ 36-1914. General penal provisions applicable to various preserves. [Repealed.]